Washington statutes.
RCW 35.17.040

Offices.

The commission shall have and maintain an office at the city hall, or such other place as the city may provide.

[ 1965 c 7 s 35.17.040. Prior: 1955 c 309 s 3; prior: 1943 c 25 s 4, part; 1911 c 116 s 14, part; Rem. Supp. 1943 s 9103, part.]